Mississippi, session 2026, HB1899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is authorized and approved for expenditure out of any special source funds which are received by or otherwise become available to the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the district for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ............................................ $ 31,629,107.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1, the following positions are authorized: AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent: 99 Time-Limited: 1 Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions and procedures established by law. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 3.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2026.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 5.  The funds herein approved for expenditure, except and less an amount approved by the State Fiscal Officer which shall be sufficient to cover disbursements for current operations, shall be deposited at interest with any official depository of the state at a rate of interest numerically not less than one percent (1%) below the bank discount rate on United States Treasury bills of comparable maturity as determined by the State Treasurer. SECTION 6.  None of the funds appropriated for expenditure under this act may be expended by Pearl River Valley Water Supply District until the district agrees to comply with the following condition:  the District shall waive traffic control fees for any vehicle displaying a REZ tag. SECTION 7.  None of the funds appropriated for expenditure under this act may be expended by Pearl River Valley Water Supply District until the district agrees to comply with the following conditions:  (1)  If any local governmental or nonprofit entity wins the bid for the ESPN Bass Masters Classic or the FLW Major Open, these events shall be exempt from the district's lottery system for host events at the reservoir and given priority of any and all date options available.  (2)  If any local governmental or nonprofit entity wins the bid for such events, the district shall waive the daily launch fees or any other special event fees for the ESPN Bass Masters Classic or the FLW Major Open.  (3)  The Catch A Dream Foundation Bass Classic shall be held on the first Sunday in May unless any local governmental or nonprofit entity wins the bid for the ESPN Bass Masters Classic or the FLW Major Open on that date.  The Catch A Dream Foundation Bass Classic shall be exempt from the district's lottery system for host events at the reservoir and given priority for the first Sunday in May.  The district shall waive the daily launch fees or any other special event fees for the Classic. SECTION 8.  Of the funds appropriated herein, Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) is provided for the purpose of funding overtime, callback or standby pay. SECTION 9. Funds are provided herein out of the Ross Barnett Reservoir Dredging Fund for dredging and other related activities to remove sediments and debris from the bottom of the Ross Barnett Reservoir. SECTION 10.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00) is provided for conducting a study on the Spillway Gates. SECTION 11.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds as authorized in House Bill 11, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, to provide for dredging operations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.......... $   1,427,719.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section, shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year. In addition, this reappropriation shall not  change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 12.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) is provided for the construction of a new office building. SECTION 13. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, Four Million Two Hundred Thirty Three Thousand Dollars ($4,233,000.00) is provided for renovating campground infrastructure. SECTION 14. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) is provided for repairs and improvements at Northshore Parkway Causeway and the Eastern side of the Breakers. SECTION 15.  The funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 16.  The money herein approved for expenditure shall be disbursed upon bank checks signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law or in accordance with the provisions of a valid trust indenture. SECTION 17.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 18.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.